apertium-br-fr/apertium-br-fr.fr.metadix
    <pardef n="accr/oître__vblex">
            
<e><p><l>ois</l><r>oître<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>ois</l><r>oître<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__encimp"/></e>
            
<e><p><l>ois</l><r>oître<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>ois</l><r>oître<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oissaient</l><r>oître<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oissais</l><r>oître<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oissais</l><r>oître<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oissait</l><r>oître<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oissant</l><r>oître<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oissant</l><r>oître<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="ND"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oisse</l><r>oître<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oisse</l><r>oître<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oissent</l><r>oître<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oissent</l><r>oître<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oisses</l><r>oître<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oissez</l><r>oître<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oissez</l><r>oître<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__encimp"/></e>
            
<e><p><l>oissez</l><r>oître<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oissiez</l><r>oître<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oissiez</l><r>oître<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oissions</l><r>oître<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oissions</l><r>oître<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oissons</l><r>oître<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oissons</l><r>oître<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__encimp"/></e>
            
<e><p><l>oissons</l><r>oître<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oît</l><r>oître<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oîtra</l><r>oître<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oîtrai</l><r>oître<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oîtraient</l><r>oître<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oîtrais</l><r>oître<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oîtrais</l><r>oître<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oîtrait</l><r>oître<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oîtras</l><r>oître<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oître</l><r>oître<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oîtrez</l><r>oître<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oîtriez</l><r>oître<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oîtrions</l><r>oître<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oîtrons</l><r>oître<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oîtront</l><r>oître<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>u</l><r>oître<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>ue</l><r>oître<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>ues</l><r>oître<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>urent</l><r>oître<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>us</l><r>oître<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>us</l><r>oître<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>us</l><r>oître<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>usse</l><r>oître<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>ussent</l><r>oître<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>usses</l><r>oître<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>ussiez</l><r>oître<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>ussions</l><r>oître<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>ut</l><r>oître<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>ûmes</l><r>oître<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>ût</l><r>oître<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>ûtes</l><r>oître<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

          <e lm="accroître"><i>accr</i><par n="accr/oître__vblex"/></e>
          <e lm="décroître"><i>décr</i><par n="accr/oître__vblex"/></e>
